Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0805.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21211. (1) A freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility must be licensed under this article. (2) "Freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility" or a similar term or abbreviation must not be used to describe or refer to a health facility or agency unless it is licensed by the department under this article. Sec. 21213. The owner, operator, and governing body of a freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility licensed under this article: (a) Are responsible for all phases of the operation of the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility, for safety and staffing protocols, and for the quality of care rendered in the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility. (b) Shall cooperate with the department in the enforcement of this article and require that the health care providers and other personnel working in the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility and for whom a state license or registration is required be currently licensed or registered. (c) Shall ensure that an individual meeting the requirements of section 21221 is appointed as the medical director of the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility to provide clinical oversight. (d) Shall ensure that at least 1 individual meeting the requirements of section 21221 is appointed as safety coordinator for the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility to be responsible for daily safety operations and the management of hyperbaric oxygen chambers. (e) Shall ensure that the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility complies with the standards in NFPA 99. Sec. 21215. (1) The department may grant a license under this part to an applicant that meets all of the following requirements: (a) The applicant meets the requirements of this part and rules promulgated by the department for licensure. (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the facility in which a hyperbaric oxygen chamber is used meets the standards for accreditation from an accreditation organization or equivalent standards, as determined by the department by rule. (2) The department shall grant a nonrenewable temporary permit for not more than 13 months to an applicant if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that additional time is needed to meet the requirements described in subsection (1)(b) and the applicant otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (1) for licensure. (3) Not later than 14 calendar days after receiving a request from the department, a freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility shall provide documentation to the department demonstrating compliance with the standards described in subsection (1)(b). Sec. 21217. (1) A freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility shall prominently display, in an area of the facility that is accessible to the public and on the facility's website, all of the following: (a) Subject to subsection (3), the certificate of licensure or permit issued by the department to the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility. (b) Subject to subsection (3), any certificate of accreditation obtained by the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility from an accreditation organization. (c) The indications for hyperbaric oxygen therapy that are recognized by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (d) A list of items or products that are considered approved for use or wear inside a hyperbaric oxygen chamber, as provided in the NFPA 99. (e) A list of items or products that are considered prohibited for use or wear inside a hyperbaric oxygen chamber, as provided by the NFPA 99. (2) A freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility shall, on request of a patient, provide the patient with any accreditation information described in this section. (3) The information displayed under subsection (1)(a) and (b) must include specific licensing and, if applicable, accreditation information, including, but not limited to, the license or permit number, the name and location of the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen chamber facility associated with the license or permit, the license or permit expiration date, the name of the accreditation organization, and the type of accreditation. Sec. 21219. (1) A freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility shall ensure all of the following: (a) That not less than 1 safety coordinator is immediately accessible to the health care providers and other personnel working in the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility, in accordance with the NFPA 99. (b) That a hyperbaric oxygen chamber in the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility is operated only as follows: (i) By an individual who has successfully completed a 40-hour training course on hyperbaric medicine that is approved by the American College of Hyperbaric Medicine, the Baromedical Nurses Association Certification Board, the National Board of Diving and Hyperbaric Medical Technology, or the Undersea and Hyperbaric Medical Society. (ii) Under the supervision of a safety coordinator in accordance with the standards in NFPA 99. (c) That, before a patient receives treatment using a hyperbaric oxygen chamber in the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility, the patient or, if the patient is a minor, the parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis of the minor, is provided with the following: (i) Information on the risks and benefits of hyperbaric oxygen therapy. (ii) Information on the indications for hyperbaric oxygen therapy that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (iii) A statement that a patient's insurance may not cover the use of a hyperbaric oxygen chamber if the use of the hyperbaric oxygen chamber is not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (d) That a hyperbaric oxygen chamber used in the freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility meets the Safety Standards for Pressure Vessels for Human Occupancy from the American Society of Mechanical Engineers or equivalent standards, as determined by the department. (2) A freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility shall obtain the signature of the patient or, if the patient is a minor, the parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis of the minor, on a form prescribed by the department indicating that the patient, or the parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis of the patient, has been given and understands the information described in subsection (1)(c). The form required by this subsection must be included in the patient's medical record, and the patient or, if the patient is a minor, the parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis of the minor must receive a printed copy of the signed form. The department shall post copies of the form required by this subsection on the department's website. (3) A medical director is not required to be in a freestanding hyperbaric oxygen chamber facility at all times while a hyperbaric oxygen chamber is in use. Sec. 21221. (1) To qualify as medical director, an individual must be a physician licensed under article 15 and meet 1 or more of the following: (a) Hold a certification in undersea and hyperbaric medicine from the American Board of Preventive Medicine, the American Board of Emergency Medicine, or an equivalent certification as determined by the department. (b) Hold a certificate of course completion in hyperbaric medicine that is approved by any of the following: (i) The American College of Hyperbaric Medicine. (ii) The Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education. (c) Hold a document demonstrating completion of an educational program that meets nationally accepted training standards in hyperbaric medicine, as determined by the department. (2) To qualify as safety coordinator, an individual must be a qualified health professional and have successfully completed not less than a 40-hour training course on hyperbaric medicine that is approved by the American College of Hyperbaric Medicine, Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education, the National Board of Diving and Hyperbaric Medical Technology, or the Undersea and Hyperbaric Medical Society. Sec. 21223. The department shall maintain and make available to the public a list of each licensee under this part. Sec. 21227. (1) The department may promulgate rules to implement this part. (2) If the NFPA 99 or a standard described in section 21215(1)(b) is revised after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this part, the department shall officially take notice of the revision. If the department determines that the revision continues to protect the public health, the department may promulgate rules to incorporate the revision by reference. If the department promulgates rules to incorporate the revision by reference, the department shall not make any changes to the revision. Sec. 21231. Notwithstanding part 201, the department shall not enforce this part or any rules promulgated for purposes of this part, including, but not limited to, the requirement that a freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility be licensed under this article, until 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this part. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 803. (b)    Senate Bill No. 804. (c)    Senate Bill No. 806.